Utah statutes.
40-8-15.   Notice of commencement to division -- Operations and progress
report.
(1)  Within 30 days after commencement of mining operations under an approved
notice of intention, the operator shall give notice of such commencement to
the division.
(2)  At the end of each calendar year, unless waived by the division, each
operator conducting mining operations under an approved notice of intention
shall file an operations and progress report with the division on a form
prescribed in the rules promulgated by the board.
